zh-CN: 棘轮驱动标准: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; 死飞/场地车; 倒刹花鼓; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; 单速; 其他
pt-PT: Padrão de driver Freehub: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fixo/pista; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Velocidade única; Outro
sl-SI: Standard gonilnega telesa račne: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fiksno/proga; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Ena prestava; Drugo
bg-BG: Стандарт на драйвера за касета: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Фиксирана предавка/пистова; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Една предавка; Друго
nb: Standard freehub-driver: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fastnav/bane; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Annet
hu: Szabadonfutó meghajtó szabvány: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fix / Pálya; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Egysebességes; Egyéb
pt-BR: Padrão do driver do freehub: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fixa/Pista; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Velocidade única; Outro
zh-TW: 棘輪座驅動標準: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; 固定齒輪/場地車; 倒踩飛輪 (Freecoaster); SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; 單速; 其他
th: มาตรฐานตัวขับฟรีฮับ: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; ฟิกซ์เกียร์/แทร็ก; ฟรีโคสเตอร์; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; ซิงเกิลสปีด; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Laisvosios stebulės laikiklio standartas: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fiksuota / treko; „Freecoaster“ stebulė; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Viena pavara; Kita
sv: Standard för frihjulsdrivare: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fast/bana; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Övrigt
ja: フリーハブドライバー標準: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; ピスト/トラック; フリーコースター; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 ロード; Shimano Micro Spline; シングルスピード; その他
cs: Standard driveru volnoběžky: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Pevný/dráhové (Fixed/Track); Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Jednorychlostní; Jiné
da: Freehub-driverstandard: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fast/bane; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Andet
el: Πρότυπο οδηγού ελεύθερου: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Σταθερό/πίστας; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Μίας ταχύτητας; Άλλο
nl: Freehub driverstandaard: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Vast/baan; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Overige
ro-RO: Standardul driverului freehub: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fixă/pistă; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; O singură viteză; Altele
it: Standard del sistema di innesto della ruota libera: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Scatto fisso/pista; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Velocità singola; Altro
de: Freilaufkörperstandard: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Starr/Bahn; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Singlespeed; Sonstiges
vi: Tiêu chuẩn trục bánh răng tự do: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Cố định/Lòng chảo; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Đơn tốc; Khác
ko: 프리허브 드라이버 규격: 캄파놀로; 캄파놀로 N3W; 고정/트랙; 프리코스터; 스램 XD; 스램 XDR; 시마노 HG; 시마노 HG 11 로드; 시마노 마이크로 스플라인; 싱글 스피드; 기타
fi: Vapaarattaan ohjain, vakio: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Kiinteä/rata; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Yksivaihteinen; Muu
ru: Стандарт драйвера freehub: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Фикс / трек; Фрикостер; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Одна скорость; Другое
en: Freehub driver standard: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fixed/Track; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Other
es: Estándar del núcleo: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Piñón fijo/pista; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Una sola velocidad; Otro
pl: Standard drivera bębenka: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Ostre koło / torowy; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 szosowy; Shimano Micro Spline; Jednobiegowy; Inny
sk-SK: Typ štandardu orecha náboja: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Pevný prevod/dráhové; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Jedna rýchlosť; Iné
fr: Standard de corps de cassette: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Pignon fixe/piste; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Vitesse unique; Autre
hr-HR: Standardni Freehub upravljački program: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Fiksni/Track; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Road; Shimano Micro Spline; Single speed; Ostalo
tr: Freehub sürücüsü standardı: Campagnolo; Campagnolo N3W; Sabit vites/pist; Freecoaster; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano HG; Shimano HG 11 Yol; Shimano Micro Spline; Tek vites; Diğer